District of Columbia statutes.
42-2151.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Actual income” means the cash equivalent of any affordable housing level expressed as a percentage of area median income.

(2)

“Affordable housing development” means any structure or building in the District that is publically subsidized utilizing federal or local funds for the purpose of providing affordable housing.

(3)

“Area median income” means the area median income of the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area as set forth in the periodic calculation provided by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(4)

“District of Columbia median family income” means the median family income solely for the District of Columbia, as calculated by the Office of the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-199, § 2, 61 DCR 12561

History